Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-818
Judgments; sale under execution.

In all cases where judgment may be rendered in favor of any person to enforce a lien under the provisions of sections 57-801 to 57-820, the leasehold interest, pipeline, or other property shall be ordered to be sold as in other cases of sales of real estate.

Laws 1957, c. 241, § 18, p. 815.